Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-307.01
Pensions and retirement plans; adoption.

A building and loan association may provide for pensions, retirement plans, and other benefits for its officers and employees, and may contribute to the cost thereof in accordance with the plan adopted by a two-thirds vote of the board of directors, and approved by a vote of a majority of all the stockholders represented at an annual meeting of such association upon written notice mailed ten days prior to the annual meeting to the last-known address of each stockholder as shown by the books of the association that a pension or retirement plan, or other plan for benefits for its officers and employees will be presented at such meeting, and approved by the Department of Banking and Finance.

Laws 1953, c. 14, § 1, p. 80.